District of Columbia statutes.
2-1201.04

Executive Director.

(a)

The Office shall be headed by an Executive Director (hereinafter in this subchapter referred to as the “Director”), who shall be appointed by the Mayor. The Director shall devote his full time to the duties of his Office, and shall appoint qualified staff including a “Business Ombudsman” charged primarily with the implementation of the functions provided in § 2-1201.03. The annual compensation of the Director shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 51 of Title 5, United States Code (relating to the classification of government employees and related matters), but shall be no less than a GS-16, step 1 or equivalent compensation pursuant to the provisions of subchapter XI of Chapter 6 of Title 1.

(b)

In order to best carry out his duties and responsibilities and to serve the people of the District in the promotion of business economic development, the Director may engage in programs and projects jointly with a private person, firm, corporation, or association, and may enter into contracts under terms to be mutually agreed upon to carry out such programs and projects not including acquisition of land or buildings. Such contracts may be negotiated and shall not be subject to the provisions of § 2-225.05 [repealed], insofar as such provisions relate to competitive bidding.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-97, § 5, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(x), 25 DCR 5740

Cross References

Effective date of this section, see § 1-636.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2204.
1973 Ed., § 1-1354.

References in Text

“GS-16, step 1”, referred to in subsection (a), is contained in the General Schedule which is set out under § 5332 of Title 5, United States Code.

Section 2-225.05, referred to in subsection (b), was repealed by D.C. Law 11-259, § 405, 44 DCR 1423, effective April 12, 1997.

Transfer of Functions

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1201.02.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-173, the “Supermarket Tax Incentive Amendment Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-84, April 24, 1989.

Editor's Notes

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 5-89 as subchapter II of Chapter 22 of Title 1 subchapter IV of Chapter 12 of Title 2, 2001 Ed., and the designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (a).

Office of Business and Economic Development abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1201.02.